Illinois, session 104th, HB1652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 50-10 and 50-15 and by adding Article 85 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 9used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 10Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:11    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 12courses at a college, university, or approved school, 13customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 14the calendar year.15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit.19    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 20person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 21nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 22(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 23clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and either has been licensed   HB1652- 2 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1by the Department or holds a multistate license issued by a 2party state, as those terms are defined in Article 85. All 3advanced practice registered nurses licensed and practicing in 4the State of Illinois shall use the title APRN and may use 5specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS after their name. 6All advanced practice registered nurses may only practice in 7accordance with national certification and this Act. 8    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 9Center Advisory Board.10    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 11"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 12of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 13by the Department under the provisions of this Act.14    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 15Secretary.16    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.17    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health 18care professionals working together, each contributing one's 19respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 20patient care.21    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 22performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 23judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 24expectations for nursing practice. 25    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 26information about the patient's physiological, psychological,   HB1652- 3 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a 2registered professional nurse and is the first step in 3implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 4    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 5practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 6another health care professional.7    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 8validating the qualifications of a health care professional.9    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 10under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.11    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation.13    "Email address of record" means the designated email 14address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 15application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 16by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.17    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 18individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 19comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 20professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or 21the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 22podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 23professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 24ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 25of the information and when to inform. 26    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an   HB1652- 4 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and 2certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 3or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 4agreement and: 5        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 6    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 7        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 8    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 9    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 10    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority 11    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 12    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 13    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 14    by the needs of the patient; and 15        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 16    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 17    provided in Section 65-43. 18    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 19registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 20licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner, 21clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 22notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 23continuing education or training in the advanced practice 24registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 25hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 26certification and who has submitted an application to the   HB1652- 5 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1Department to be granted full practice authority. 2    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 3joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 4organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 5to the provision, management, or support of health care 6services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 7controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 8the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 9least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 10A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any 11combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 12physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 13in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 14maintenance organization regulated under the Health 15Maintenance Organization Act. 16    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 17is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 18of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 19determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 20including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a 21psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 22her ability to deliver competent patient care.23    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 24a registered professional nurse who has completed all 25requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 26nurse except the certification examination and has applied to   HB1652- 6 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1take the next available certification exam and received a 2temporary permit from the Department.3    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 4passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 5and has applied for a license from the Department. A 6license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 7pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.8    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 9clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 10An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 11professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 12registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 13to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 14other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 15intervention based on patient safety. 16    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 17in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.18    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 19podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 20    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 21person who practices practical nursing as defined in this Act 22and either is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act or 23holds a multistate license issued by a party state, as those 24terms are defined in Article 85 and practices practical 25nursing as defined in this Act. Only a practical nurse 26licensed under this Act is entitled to use the title "licensed   HB1652- 7 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1practical nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N.".2    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 3interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and 4skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 5nursing education program. Practical nursing includes 6assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 7registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 8registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 9direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 10physician, or other health care professional determined by the 11Department.12    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 13governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 14organization to provide specific patient care services within 15well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 16credentialing process. 17    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 18means a person who practices nursing as defined in this Act and 19either is licensed as a professional nurse under this Act or 20holds a multistate license issued by a party state, as those 21terms are defined in Article 85 and practices nursing as 22defined in this Act. Only a registered nurse licensed under 23this Act is entitled to use the titles "registered nurse" and 24"registered professional nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".25    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 26scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge   HB1652- 8 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 2promotion, and optimization of health and abilities, 3prevention of illness and injury, development and 4implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 5nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care 6coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 7families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 8professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 9medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 10corrective measures.11    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 12professional assistance program that meets criteria 13established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 14Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 15approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 16practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 17addiction.18    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 19Professional Regulation.20    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 21standing.22    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 23agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 24collaborating physician, dentist, or podiatric physician 25pursuant to Section 65-35. 26(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25.)   HB1652- 9 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    (225 ILCS 65/50-15)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-15)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)3    Sec. 50-15. Policy; application of Act. 4    (a) For the protection of life and the promotion of 5health, and the prevention of illness and communicable 6diseases, any person practicing or offering to practice 7advanced, professional, or practical nursing in Illinois shall 8submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice, and 9shall be licensed as provided under this Act. No person shall 10practice or offer to practice advanced, professional, or 11practical nursing in Illinois or use any title, sign, card or 12device to indicate that such a person is practicing 13professional or practical nursing unless such person has been 14licensed under the provisions of this Act.15    (b) This Act does not prohibit the following:16        (1) The practice of nursing in Federal employment in 17    the discharge of the employee's duties by a person who is 18    employed by the United States government or any bureau, 19    division or agency thereof and is a legally qualified and 20    licensed nurse of another state or territory and not in 21    conflict with Sections 50-50, 55-10, 60-10, and 70-5 of 22    this Act.23        (2) Nursing that is included in the program of study 24    by students enrolled in programs of nursing or in current 25    nurse practice update courses approved by the Department.  HB1652- 10 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        (3) The furnishing of nursing assistance in an 2    emergency.3        (4) The practice of nursing by a nurse who holds an 4    active license in another state when providing services to 5    patients in Illinois during a bonafide emergency or in 6    immediate preparation for or during interstate transit.7        (5) The incidental care of the sick by members of the 8    family, domestic servants or housekeepers, or care of the 9    sick where treatment is by prayer or spiritual means.10        (6) Persons from being employed as unlicensed 11    assistive personnel in private homes, long term care 12    facilities, nurseries, hospitals or other institutions.13        (7) The practice of practical nursing by one who is a 14    licensed practical nurse under the laws of another U.S. 15    jurisdiction and has applied in writing to the Department, 16    in form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 17    a license as a licensed practical nurse and who is 18    qualified to receive such license under this Act, until 19    (i) the expiration of 6 months after the filing of such 20    written application, (ii) the withdrawal of such 21    application, or (iii) the denial of such application by 22    the Department.23        (7.5) The practice of practical nursing by one who is 24    a practical nurse under a multistate license issued by a 25    party state, as those terms are defined in Article 85, and 26    has applied in writing to the Department, in form and   HB1652- 11 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as 2    a practical nurse and who is qualified to receive such 3    license under this Act, until (i) the expiration of 6 4    months after the filing of such written application, (ii) 5    the withdrawal of such application, or (iii) the denial of 6    such application by the Department.7        (8) The practice of advanced practice registered 8    nursing by one who is an advanced practice registered 9    nurse under the laws of another United States jurisdiction 10    or a foreign jurisdiction and has applied in writing to 11    the Department, in form and substance satisfactory to the 12    Department, for a license as an advanced practice 13    registered nurse and who is qualified to receive such 14    license under this Act, until (i) the expiration of 6 15    months after the filing of such written application, (ii) 16    the withdrawal of such application, or (iii) the denial of 17    such application by the Department. 18        (8.5) The practice of advanced practice registered 19    nursing by one who is an advanced practice registered 20    nurse under a multistate license issued by a party state, 21    as those terms are defined in Article 85, and has applied 22    in writing to the Department, in form and substance 23    satisfactory to the Department, for a license as an 24    advanced practice registered nurse and who is qualified to 25    receive such license under this Act, until (i) the 26    expiration of 6 months after the filing of such written   HB1652- 12 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    application, (ii) the withdrawal of such application, or 2    (iii) the denial of such application by the Department.3        (9) The practice of professional nursing by one who is 4    a registered professional nurse under the laws of another 5    United States jurisdiction or a foreign jurisdiction and 6    has applied in writing to the Department, in form and 7    substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as 8    a registered professional nurse and who is qualified to 9    receive such license under Section 55-10, until (1) the 10    expiration of 6 months after the filing of such written 11    application, (2) the withdrawal of such application, or 12    (3) the denial of such application by the Department.13        (9.5) The practice of professional nursing by one who 14    is a registered professional nurse under a multistate 15    license issued by a party state, as those terms are 16    defined in Article 85, and has applied in writing to the 17    Department, in form and substance satisfactory to the 18    Department, for a license as a professional nurse and who 19    is qualified to receive such license under this Act, until 20    (i) the expiration of 6 months after the filing of such 21    written application, (ii) the withdrawal of such 22    application, or (iii) the denial of such application by 23    the Department.24        (10) The practice of professional nursing that is 25    included in a program of study by one who is a registered 26    professional nurse under the laws of another United States   HB1652- 13 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    jurisdiction or a foreign jurisdiction and who is enrolled 2    in a graduate nursing education program or a program for 3    the completion of a baccalaureate nursing degree in this 4    State, which includes clinical supervision by faculty as 5    determined by the educational institution offering the 6    program and the health care organization where the 7    practice of nursing occurs.8        (10.5) The practice of professional nursing that is 9    included in a program of study by one who is a registered 10    professional nurse under a multistate license issued by a 11    party state, as those terms are defined in Article 85, and 12    has applied in writing to the Department, in form and 13    substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as 14    a professional nurse and who is qualified to receive such 15    license under this Act, until (i) the expiration of 6 16    months after the filing of such written application, (ii) 17    the withdrawal of such application, or (iii) the denial of 18    such application by the Department.19        (11) Any person licensed in this State under any other 20    Act from engaging in the practice for which she or he is 21    licensed.22        (12) Delegation to authorized direct care staff 23    trained under Section 15.4 of the Mental Health and 24    Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act consistent 25    with the policies of the Department. 26        (13) (Blank).  HB1652- 14 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        (14) County correctional personnel from delivering 2    prepackaged medication for self-administration to an 3    individual detainee in a correctional facility. 4    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 5delegation of tasks or duties by a physician, dentist, or 6podiatric physician to a licensed practical nurse, a 7registered professional nurse, or other persons. 8(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 9    (225 ILCS 65/Art. 85 heading new)10ARTICLE 85. NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT 11    (225 ILCS 65/85-5 new)12    Sec. 85-5. Nurse Licensure Compact. The State of Illinois 13ratifies and approves the following Compact: 14ARTICLE I 15Findings and Declaration of Purpose 16    a. The party states find that:17        1. The health and safety of the public are affected by 18    the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of 19    enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure 20    laws;21        2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws 22    regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or   HB1652- 15 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    harm to the public;2        3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of 3    advanced communication technologies as part of our 4    nation's health care delivery system require greater 5    coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of 6    nurse licensure and regulation;7        4. New practice modalities and technology make 8    compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws 9    difficult and complex;10        5. The current system of duplicative licensure for 11    nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and 12    redundant for both nurses and states; and13        6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements 14    throughout the states promotes public safety and public 15    health benefits. 16    b. The general purposes of this Compact are to: 17        1. Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect 18    the public's health and safety;19        2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party 20    states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;21        3. Facilitate the exchange of information between 22    party states in the areas of nurse regulation, 23    investigation and adverse actions;24        4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the 25    practice of nursing in each jurisdiction;26        5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold   HB1652- 16 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in 2    the state in which the patient is located at the time care 3    is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state 4    licenses; 5        6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and 6    issuance of nurse licenses; and7        7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by 8    nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements.  9ARTICLE II 10Definitions 11    As used in this Compact:12        a. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, 13    equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws 14    which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority 15    against a nurse, including actions against an individual's 16    license or multistate licensure privilege such as 17    revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 18    licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any 19    other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's 20    authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease 21    and desist action.22        b. "Alternative program" means a non-disciplinary 23    monitoring program approved by a licensing board.24        c. "Coordinated licensure information system" means an   HB1652- 17 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing 2    information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities 3    related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a 4    nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by 5    licensing boards.6        d. "Current significant investigative information" 7    means:8            1. Investigative information that a licensing 9        board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes 10        notification and an opportunity for the nurse to 11        respond, if required by state law, has reason to 12        believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would 13        indicate more than a minor infraction; or14            2. Investigative information that indicates that 15        the nurse represents an immediate threat to public 16        health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has 17        been notified and had an opportunity to respond.18        e. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, 19    or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice 20    of nursing imposed by a licensing board.21        f. "Home state" means the party state which is the 22    nurse's primary state of residence.23        g. "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory 24    body responsible for issuing nurse licenses.25        h. "Multistate license" means a license to practice as 26    a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse   HB1652- 18 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that 2    authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party 3    states under a multistate licensure privilege.4        i. "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal 5    authorization associated with a multistate license 6    permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered 7    nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state.8        j. "Nurse" means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are 9    defined by each party state's practice laws.10        k. "Party state" means any state that has adopted this 11    Compact.12        l. "Remote state" means a party state, other than the 13    home state.14        m. "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued 15    by a party state that authorizes practice only within the 16    issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure 17    privilege to practice in any other party state.18        n. "State" means a state, territory or possession of 19    the United States and the District of Columbia.20        o. "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, 21    rules and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, 22    define the scope of nursing practice, and create the 23    methods and grounds for imposing discipline. "State 24    practice laws" do not include requirements necessary to 25    obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or 26    requirements of the home state.    HB1652- 19 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1ARTICLE III 2General Provisions and Jurisdiction 3    a. A multistate license to practice registered or licensed 4practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a 5resident in that state will be recognized by each party state 6as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) 7or as a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a 8multistate licensure privilege, in each party state.9    b. A state must implement procedures for considering the 10criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate 11license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall 12include the submission of fingerprints or other 13biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of 14obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information 15from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency 16responsible for retaining that state's criminal records.17    c. Each party state shall require the following for an 18applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home 19state:20        1. Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure 21    or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable 22    state laws;23        2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a 24    licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure   HB1652- 20 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    education program; or2        ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN 3    prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved 4    by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable 5    country and (b) has been verified by an independent 6    credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing 7    board-approved prelicensure education program;8        3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure 9    education program not taught in English or if English is 10    not the individual's native language, successfully passed 11    an English proficiency examination that includes the 12    components of reading, speaking, writing and listening;13        4. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN® or NCLEX-PN® 14    Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable;15        5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered 16    license;17        6. Has submitted, in connection with an application 18    for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, 19    fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of 20    obtaining criminal history record information from the 21    Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible 22    for retaining that state's criminal records;23        7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has 24    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense 25    under applicable state or federal criminal law;26        8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has   HB1652- 21 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor 2    offense related to the practice of nursing as determined 3    on a case-by-case basis;4        9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative 5    program;6        10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements 7    regarding current participation in an alternative program; 8    and9        11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.10    d. All party states shall be authorized, in accordance 11with existing state due process law, to take adverse action 12against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as 13revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that 14affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate 15licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions. If a 16party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the 17administrator of the coordinated licensure information system. 18The administrator of the coordinated licensure information 19system shall promptly notify the home state of any such 20actions by remote states.21    e. A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the 22state practice laws of the state in which the client is located 23at the time service is provided. The practice of nursing is not 24limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing 25practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party 26state in which the client is located. The practice of nursing   HB1652- 22 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will 2subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, 3the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client 4is located at the time service is provided.5    f. Individuals not residing in a party state shall 6continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state 7license as provided under the laws of each party state. 8However, the single-state license granted to these individuals 9will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice 10nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact 11shall affect the requirements established by a party state for 12the issuance of a single-state license.13    g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on 14the effective date of this Compact, may retain and renew the 15multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home 16state, provided that:17        1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence 18    after this Compact's effective date, must meet all 19    applicable Article III.c. requirements to obtain a 20    multistate license from a new home state.21        2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate 22    licensure requirements in Article III.c. due to a 23    disqualifying event occurring after this Compact's 24    effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a 25    multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license 26    shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with   HB1652- 23 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of 2    Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("Commission").  3ARTICLE IV 4Applications for Licensure in a Party State 5    a. Upon application for a multistate license, the 6licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, 7through the coordinated licensure information system, whether 8the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license 9issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances 10on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 11applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against 12any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the 13applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating 14in an alternative program.15    b. A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the 16home state, in only one party state at a time.17    c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 18between two party states, the nurse must apply for licensure 19in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the 20prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with 21applicable rules adopted by the Commission.22        1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a 23    change in primary state of residence.24        2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new   HB1652- 24 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence 2    of a change in primary state of residence to the new home 3    state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain 4    a multistate license from the new home state.5    d. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving 6from a party state to a non-party state, the multistate 7license issued by the prior home state will convert to a 8single-state license, valid only in the former home state.  9ARTICLE V 10Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing 11Boards 12    a. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, 13a licensing board shall have the authority to: 14        1. Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate 15    licensure privilege to practice within that party state.16            i. Only the home state shall have the power to take 17        adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the 18        home state.19            ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the 20        home state licensing board shall give the same 21        priority and effect to reported conduct received from 22        a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred 23        within the home state. In so doing, the home state 24        shall apply its own state laws to determine   HB1652- 25 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        appropriate action.2        2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an 3    encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that 4    party state.5        3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who 6    changes primary state of residence during the course of 7    such investigations. The licensing board shall also have 8    the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall 9    promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to 10    the administrator of the coordinated licensure information 11    system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure 12    information system shall promptly notify the new home 13    state of any such actions.14        4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 15    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 16    of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. 17    Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for 18    the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 19    production of evidence from another party state shall be 20    enforced in the latter state by any court of competent 21    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 22    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 23    pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any 24    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees 25    required by the service statutes of the state in which the 26    witnesses or evidence are located.  HB1652- 26 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure 2    applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based 3    information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 4    criminal background checks, receive the results of the 5    Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal 6    background checks and use the results in making licensure 7    decisions.8        6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from 9    the affected nurse the costs of investigations and 10    disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action 11    taken against that nurse.12        7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings 13    of the remote state, provided that the licensing board 14    follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.15    b. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a 16nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure 17privilege to practice in all other party states shall be 18deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the 19multistate license. All home state disciplinary orders that 20impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license 21shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate 22licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during 23the pendency of the order.24    c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state's 25decision that participation in an alternative program may be 26used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board   HB1652- 27 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the 2multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the 3nurse's participation in an alternative program.  4ARTICLE VI 5Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of 6Information 7    a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated 8licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses 9(RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). 10This system will include information on the licensure and 11disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party 12states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and 13enforcement efforts.14    b. The Commission, in consultation with the administrator 15of the coordinated licensure information system, shall 16formulate necessary and proper procedures for the 17identification, collection and exchange of information under 18this Compact.19    c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the 20coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, 21any current significant investigative information, denials of 22applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse 23participation in alternative programs known to the licensing 24board regardless of whether such participation is deemed   HB1652- 28 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1nonpublic or confidential under state law.2    d. Current significant investigative information and 3participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative 4programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated 5licensure information system only to party state licensing 6boards.7    e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party 8state licensing boards contributing information to the 9coordinated licensure information system may designate 10information that may not be shared with non-party states or 11disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express 12permission of the contributing state.13    f. Any personally identifiable information obtained from 14the coordinated licensure information system by a party state 15licensing board shall not be shared with non-party states or 16disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the 17extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing 18the information.19    g. Any information contributed to the coordinated 20licensure information system that is subsequently required to 21be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that 22information shall also be expunged from the coordinated 23licensure information system.24    h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall 25furnish a uniform data set to the Compact administrator of 26each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:  HB1652- 29 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        1. Identifying information;2        2. Licensure data;3        3. Information related to alternative program 4    participation; and5        4. Other information that may facilitate the 6    administration of this Compact, as determined by 7    Commission rules.8    i. The Compact administrator of a party state shall 9provide all investigative documents and information requested 10by another party state.  11ARTICLE VII 12Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure 13Compact Administrators 14    a. The party states hereby create and establish a joint 15public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse 16Licensure Compact Administrators.17        1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party 18    states.19        2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or 20    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 21    exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where 22    the principal office of the Commission is located. The 23    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 24    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in   HB1652- 30 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    alternative dispute resolution proceedings.2        3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 3    waiver of sovereign immunity.4    b. Membership, Voting and Meetings5        1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one 6    administrator. The head of the state licensing board or 7    designee shall be the administrator of this Compact for 8    each party state. Any administrator may be removed or 9    suspended from office as provided by the law of the state 10    from which the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy 11    occurring in the Commission shall be filled in accordance 12    with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy 13    exists.14        2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) 15    vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation 16    of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to 17    participate in the business and affairs of the Commission. 18    An administrator shall vote in person or by such other 19    means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide 20    for an administrator's participation in meetings by 21    telephone or other means of communication.22        3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 23    calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set 24    forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.25        4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and 26    public notice of meetings shall be given in the same   HB1652- 31 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in 2    Article VIII.3        5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic 4    meeting if the Commission must discuss:5            i. Noncompliance of a party state with its 6        obligations under this Compact;7            ii. The employment, compensation, discipline or 8        other personnel matters, practices or procedures 9        related to specific employees or other matters related 10        to the Commission's internal personnel practices and 11        procedures;12            iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated 13        litigation;14            iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or 15        sale of goods, services or real estate;16            v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 17        censuring any person;18            vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or 19        financial information that is privileged or 20        confidential;21            vii. Disclosure of information of a personal 22        nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly 23        unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;24            viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled 25        for law enforcement purposes;26            ix. Disclosure of information related to any   HB1652- 32 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        reports prepared by or on behalf of the Commission for 2        the purpose of investigation of compliance with this 3        Compact; or4            x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 5        by federal or state statute.6        6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed 7    pursuant to this provision, the Commission's legal counsel 8    or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed 9    and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The 10    Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly 11    describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall 12    provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and 13    the reasons therefor, including a description of the views 14    expressed. All documents considered in connection with an 15    action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes 16    and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, 17    subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or 18    order of a court of competent jurisdiction.19    c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the 20administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its 21conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the 22purposes and exercise the powers of this Compact, including 23but not limited to:24        1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;25        2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:26            i. For the establishment and meetings of other   HB1652- 33 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        committees; and2            ii. Governing any general or specific delegation 3        of any authority or function of the Commission;4        3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and 5    conducting meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable 6    advance notice of all meetings and providing an 7    opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested 8    parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect 9    the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and 10    proprietary information, including trade secrets. The 11    Commission may meet in closed session only after a 12    majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in 13    whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission 14    must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting 15    revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy 16    votes allowed;17        4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and 18    reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of 19    the Commission;20        5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for 21    the establishment of the personnel policies and programs 22    of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or 23    other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall 24    exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of 25    the Commission; and26        6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations   HB1652- 34 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    of the Commission and the equitable disposition of any 2    surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this 3    Compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts 4    and obligations;5    d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and 6any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of 7the Commission.8    e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in 9accordance with the bylaws.10    f. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are 11consistent with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.12    g. The Commission shall have the following powers:13        1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and 14    coordinate implementation and administration of this 15    Compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law 16    and shall be binding in all party states;17        2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions 18    in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing 19    of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable 20    law shall not be affected;21        3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;22        4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of 23    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 24    party state or nonprofit organizations;25        5. To cooperate with other organizations that 26    administer state compacts related to the regulation of   HB1652- 35 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    nursing, including but not limited to sharing 2    administrative or staff expenses, office space or other 3    resources;4        6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 5    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 6    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this 7    Compact, and to establish the Commission's personnel 8    policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 9    qualifications of personnel and other related personnel 10    matters;11        7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants 12    and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and 13    services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; 14    provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 15    appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;16        8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or 17    donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, 18    any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided 19    that at all times the Commission shall avoid any 20    appearance of impropriety;21        9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 22    abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether 23    real, personal or mixed;24        10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;25        11. To borrow money;26        12. To appoint committees, including advisory   HB1652- 36 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    committees comprised of administrators, state nursing 2    regulators, state legislators or their representatives, 3    and consumer representatives, and other such interested 4    persons;5        13. To provide and receive information from, and to 6    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;7        14. To adopt and use an official seal; and8        15. To perform such other functions as may be 9    necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this 10    Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse 11    licensure and practice.12    h. Financing of the Commission13        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 14    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 15    organization and ongoing activities.16        2. The Commission may also levy on and collect an 17    annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost 18    of its operations, activities and staff in its annual 19    budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual 20    assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a 21    formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall 22    promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states.23        3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 24    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 25    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 26    the party states, except by, and with the authority of,   HB1652- 37 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    such party state.2        4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 3    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 4    of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and 5    accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 6    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 7    by the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified 8    or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit 9    shall be included in and become part of the annual report 10    of the Commission.11    i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification12        1. The administrators, officers, executive director, 13    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 14    immune from suit and liability, either personally or in 15    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 16    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 17    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 18    alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the 19    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 20    basis for believing occurred, within the scope of 21    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 22    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 23    to protect any such person from suit or liability for any 24    damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the 25    intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person.26        2. The Commission shall defend any administrator,   HB1652- 38 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    officer, executive director, employee or representative of 2    the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose 3    liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error 4    or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 5    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person 6    against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for 7    believing occurred within the scope of Commission 8    employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that 9    nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person 10    from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided 11    further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission 12    did not result from that person's intentional, willful or 13    wanton misconduct.14        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 15    any administrator, officer, executive director, employee 16    or representative of the Commission for the amount of any 17    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 18    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or 19    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 20    employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such 21    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 22    within the scope of Commission employment, duties or 23    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 24    error or omission did not result from the intentional, 25    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.    HB1652- 39 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1ARTICLE VIII 2Rulemaking 3    a. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 4pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Article and the 5rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become 6binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and 7shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this 8Compact.9    b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a 10regular or special meeting of the Commission.11    c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or 12rules by the Commission, and at least sixty (60) days in 13advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and 14voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed 15rulemaking:16        1. On the website of the Commission; and17        2. On the website of each licensing board or the 18    publication in which each state would otherwise publish 19    proposed rules.20    d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:21        1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting 22    in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;23        2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the 24    reason for the proposed rule;25        3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from   HB1652- 40 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    any interested person; and2        4. The manner in which interested persons may submit 3    notice to the Commission of their intention to attend the 4    public hearing and any written comments.5    e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission 6shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions 7and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.8    f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public 9hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment.10    g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date 11of the scheduled public hearing.12        1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing 13    each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable 14    opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings 15    will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon 16    request.17        2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as 18    requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be 19    grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings 20    required by this section.21    h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission 22may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule.23    i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close 24of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was 25not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral 26comments received.  HB1652- 41 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all 2administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and 3shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based 4on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.5    k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 6Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without 7prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided 8that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact 9and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule 10as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 11(90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the 12purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must 13be adopted immediately in order to:14        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or 15    welfare;16        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; 17    or18        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an 19    administrative rule that is required by federal law or 20    rule.21    l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously 22adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting 23typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency 24or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be 25posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be 26subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30)   HB1652- 42 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on 2grounds that the revision results in a material change to a 3rule. A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to 4the Commission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no 5challenge is made, the revision will take effect without 6further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision 7may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.  8ARTICLE IX 9Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement 10    a. Oversight11        1. Each party state shall enforce this Compact and 12    take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate 13    this Compact's purposes and intent.14        2. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 15    of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, 16    responsibilities or actions of the Commission, and shall 17    have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all 18    purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such 19    proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or 20    order void as to the Commission, this Compact or 21    promulgated rules.22    b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination23        1. If the Commission determines that a party state has 24    defaulted in the performance of its obligations or   HB1652- 43 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 2    rules, the Commission shall:3            i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state 4        and other party states of the nature of the default, 5        the proposed means of curing the default or any other 6        action to be taken by the Commission; and7            ii. Provide remedial training and specific 8        technical assistance regarding the default.9        2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the 10    defaulting state's membership in this Compact may be 11    terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the 12    administrators, and all rights, privileges and benefits 13    conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the 14    effective date of termination. A cure of the default does 15    not relieve the offending state of obligations or 16    liabilities incurred during the period of default.17        3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be 18    imposed only after all other means of securing compliance 19    have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or 20    terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor 21    of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of 22    the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the 23    party states.24        4. A state whose membership in this Compact has been 25    terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations 26    and liabilities incurred through the effective date of   HB1652- 44 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    termination, including obligations that extend beyond the 2    effective date of termination.3        5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to 4    a state that is found to be in default or whose membership 5    in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in 6    writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.7        6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the 8    Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 9    District of Columbia or the federal district in which the 10    Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party 11    shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including 12    reasonable attorneys' fees.13    c. Dispute Resolution14        1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall 15    attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that 16    arise among party states and between party and non-party 17    states.18        2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing 19    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 20    disputes, as appropriate.21        3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes 22    among party states arising under this Compact:23            i. The party states may submit the issues in 24        dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be 25        comprised of individuals appointed by the Compact 26        administrator in each of the affected party states and   HB1652- 45 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1        an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact 2        administrators of all the party states involved in the 3        dispute.4            ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators 5        shall be final and binding.6    d. Enforcement7        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 8    discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this 9    Compact.10        2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal 11    action in the U.S. District Court for the District of 12    Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission 13    has its principal offices against a party state that is in 14    default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this 15    Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief 16    sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In 17    the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the 18    prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such 19    litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.20        3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive 21    remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any 22    other remedies available under federal or state law.  23ARTICLE X 24Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment HB1652- 46 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the 2earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this Compact 3into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 42018. All party states to this Compact, that also were parties 5to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this 6Compact, ("Prior Compact"), shall be deemed to have withdrawn 7from said Prior Compact within six (6) months after the 8effective date of this Compact.9    b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to 10recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice 11in that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such 12party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.13    c. Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by 14enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state's 15withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after 16enactment of the repealing statute.17    d. A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not 18affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or 19terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions 20and significant investigations occurring prior to the 21effective date of such withdrawal or termination.22    e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 23invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other 24cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party 25state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of 26this Compact.  HB1652- 47 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No 2amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 3upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the 4laws of all party states.5    g. Representatives of non-party states to this Compact 6shall be invited to participate in the activities of the 7Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of 8this Compact by all states.  9ARTICLE XI 10Construction and Severability 11This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate 12the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be 13severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of 14this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of 15any party state or of the United States, or if the 16applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 17circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of 18this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, 19agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. 20If this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the 21constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain in 22full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in 23full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all 24severable matters.    HB1652- 48 -LRB104 07661 AAS 17705 b1    (225 ILCS 65/85-10 new)2    Sec. 85-10. State labor laws. The Nurse Licensure Compact 3does not supersede existing State labor laws. 4    (225 ILCS 65/85-15 new)5    Sec. 85-15. Criminal history record checks. The State may 6not share with or disclose to the Interstate Commission of 7Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators or any other state any 8of the contents of a nationwide criminal history records check 9conducted for the purpose of multistate licensure under the 10Nurse Licensure Compact.